Nebraska, session 109, LB90.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 16-617, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
16-617 The mayor and city council of any city of the first class shall
have power to construct and make improvements of any street, streets, alley,
alleys, sidewalk, sidewalks, public way, public ways, other public spaces, or
any part of any street, streets, alley, or alleys, sidewalk, sidewalks, public
way, public ways, or other public spaces, in the city, a street which divides
the corporate limits of the city and the area adjoining the city, or within a
county industrial area as defined in section 13-1111 contiguous to such city,
and for that purpose to create suitable improvement districts, which shall be
consecutively numbered, and such work shall be done under contract. Such
districts may include properties within the corporate limits, adjoining the
corporate limits, and within county industrial areas as defined in section
13-1111 contiguous to such cities. The improvements in such districts may be
funded at public cost or by the levy of special assessments on the property
especially benefited in proportion to such benefits. The mayor and city council
shall create an improvement district or districts by ordinance.
Sec. 2. Section 16-617.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
16-617.01 As used in sections 16-617 to 16-649, improvement shall include,
but shall not be limited to, paving, repaving, graveling, grading, curbing,
guttering, and the construction and replacement of pedestrian walks, plazas,
malls, landscaping, lighting systems, and permanent facilities used in an
improvement district connection therewith.
Sec. 3. Section 16-618, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
16-618 Any improvement district created pursuant to section 16-617 may
shall include only portions of different streets, or portions of alleys,
sidewalks, public ways, or other public spaces or portions of each, which abut,
intersect, or adjoin, and may include two or more types of improvements in a
single district in one ordinance so that such district, when created, makes up
one continuous or extended street or more, except that the district may include
a cul de sac, any street, alley, or portion thereof which is closed at one end
or which connects with only one other existing street, alley, or portion
thereof. Any improvement district may include portions of different streets, or
portions of different alleys, or portions of each, if they abut or connect with
each other, or if the several portions abut on pavement or gravel already laid,
or any other of improvements already laid.
Sec. 4. Section 16-619, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
16-619 For every improvement district within which any of the improvements
are to be funded by a levy of special assessments on the property especially
benefited, after The mayor and city council of any city of the first class
exercising authority to make improvements as provided under section 16-617
shall, by ordinance, create an improvement district or districts. After the
passage, approval, and publication of an such ordinance creating such district,
the city clerk shall publish notice of the creation of any such district or
districts one time each week for not less than twenty days in a legal newspaper
in or of general circulation in the city.
Sec. 5. Section 16-620, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
16-620 After publication of a notice required by section 16-619, if If the
owners of the record title at the time of such publication representing more
than fifty percent of the front footage of the property abutting, intersecting,
or adjoining any continuous or extended street, cul de sac, or alley of an
improvement district created pursuant to section 16-617, or portion thereof
which is closed at one end, and who were such owners at the time the ordinance
creating such district was published, shall file with the city clerk, within
twenty days from the first publication of such notice, written objections to
the creation improvement of such a district, such work shall not be done in
such district under such ordinance, but such ordinance shall be repealed by the
mayor and city council. If objections are not filed against any district in the
time and manner provided in this section, the mayor and city council shall
forthwith proceed to construct improvements such improvement.
-1-

LB90 LB90
2025 2025
Sec. 6. Section 16-621, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
16-621 (1) In advertising for bids for paving, repaving, graveling, or
macadamizing, the mayor and city council of a city of the first class may
provide for bids on different materials and types of construction.
(2)(a) In advertising for bids for improvements in an improvement district
formed pursuant to section 16-624, the mayor and city council of a city of the
first class , and shall in addition provide for asking bids on any material or
materials that may be suggested by petition of owners of the record title
representing twenty-five percent of the abutting property owners in such an
improvement district, if such petition is filed with the city clerk before
advertisement for bids is ordered.
(b) On opening of bids for paving or repaving in any such district, the
mayor and city council shall postpone action thereon for a period of not less
than ten days.
(c) During such period of postponement, the owners of the record title
representing a majority of the abutting property owners in such a district may
file with the city clerk a petition for the use of a particular material for
paving for which a bid has been received, in which event a bid on that material
shall be accepted and the work shall be done with that material.
(d) The regulations as to advertising for bids and opening of bids and
postponing of action thereon and the right of selection of materials shall not
apply in case of graveling for such district.
(e) In case such owners in such district fail to designate the material
the owners they desire used in such paving or repaving, or macadamizing, in the
manner and within the time provided in this section, the mayor and city council
shall determine the material to be used.
(3) The mayor and city council may reject all bids and readvertise if, in
their judgment, the public interest requires.
Sec. 7. Section 16-622, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
16-622 The cost of making improvements of the streets and alleys within
any improvement district created pursuant to section 16-617 16-619 or 16-624,
which are to be funded by the levy of special assessments on the property
especially benefited in proportion to such benefits, shall be assessed upon the
lots and lands in such districts specially benefited thereby in proportion to
such benefits. The amounts thereof shall, except as provided in sections
19-2428 to 19-2431, be determined by the mayor and city council under section
16-615. The assessment of the special tax for the cost of such improvements,
except as provided in this section, shall be levied at one time and shall
become delinquent in equal annual installments over such period of years, not
to exceed twenty, as the mayor and city council may determine at the time of
making the levy, the first such installment to become delinquent in fifty days
after the date of such levy. Each installment, including those for graveling
and the construction and replacement of pedestrian walks, plazas, malls,
landscaping, lighting systems, and permanent facilities used in connection
therewith as provided in this section, except the first, shall draw interest at
a rate established by the mayor and city council not exceeding the rate of
interest specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be
adjusted by the Legislature, from the time of levy until the levy becomes
delinquent. After the levy becomes delinquent, interest at the rate specified
in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the
Legislature, shall be paid thereon. Should there be three or more installments
delinquent and unpaid on the same property, the mayor and city council may by
resolution declare all future installments on such delinquent property to be
due on a future fixed date. The resolution shall set forth the description of
the property and the names of its record title owners and shall provide that
all future installments shall become delinquent upon the date fixed. A copy of
such resolution shall be published one time each week for not less than twenty
days in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the city, and after
the fixed date such future installments shall be deemed to be delinquent and
the city may proceed to enforce and collect the total amount due and all future
installments. For assessments for graveling alone and without guttering or
curbing, one-third of the total amount assessed against each lot or parcel of
land shall become delinquent in fifty days after the date of the levy of the
same, one-third in one year, and one-third in two years. The entire cost of
improving any street, avenue, or alley, properly chargeable to any lot or land
within any such district, may be paid by the owners of such lots or lands
within fifty days after the levying of such special assessments, and thereupon
such lots or lands shall be exempt from any lien or charge therefor.
Sec. 8. Section 16-623, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
16-623 For the purpose of paying the cost of improvements to be made
improving the streets, avenues, or alleys in an improvement district created
pursuant to section 16-617 16-619 or 16-624, exclusive of intersections of
streets or avenues, or spaces opposite alleys therein, the mayor and city
council shall have power and may, by ordinance, cause to be issued bonds of the
city , to be called Street Improvement Bonds of District No. ....., payable in
not exceeding twenty years from date of the original issue of such bonds, and
bearing interest, payable as provided in the ordinance authorizing such bonds
either annually or semiannually, with interest coupons attached. In such cases
the mayor and city council they shall also provide that any the special taxes
and assessments imposed pursuant to section 16-622 shall constitute a sinking
-2-

LB90 LB90
2025 2025
fund for the payment of the bonds. The entire cost of improving any such
street, avenue, or alley, properly chargeable to any lot or land within any
such improvement district according to the front footage thereof, may be paid
by the owners of such lots or lands within fifty days from the levying of such
special taxes, and thereupon such lot or lands shall be exempt from any lien or
charge therefor.
Sec. 9. Section 16-624, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
16-624 Whenever the owners of lots or lands abutting upon any street,
avenue, or alley within a city of the first class, representing three-fourths
of the front footage thereon, so that an improvement district when created will
make up one continuous or extended thoroughfare or more, shall petition the
mayor and city council to make improvement of such street, avenue, or alley
without cost to the city, and to assess the entire cost of any such
improvements in any such street, avenue, or alley, including intersections of
streets or avenues and spaces opposite alleys, against the private property
within such improvement district or districts, it shall be the duty of the
mayor and city council to create the proper improvement district or districts,
which shall be consecutively numbered, and to improve the same and to proceed
in the same manner and form as provided for in other improvement districts. The
mayor and city council shall have power to levy the entire cost of such
improvements of any such street, avenue, or alley, including intersections of
streets or avenues and spaces opposite alleys, against the private property
within such district, and to issue street improvement bonds Street Improvement
Bonds of District No. ..... to pay for such improvements in the same manner and
form as provided for in other improvement bonds. Such bonds shall be issued to
cover the entire cost of so improving such streets or avenues, intersections of
the same, and spaces opposite alleys. If the assessments provided for, or any
part thereof, shall fail, or for any reason shall be invalid, the mayor and
city council may make other and further assessments upon such lots or lands as
may be required to collect from the same the cost of any improvements properly
chargeable thereto, as provided in this section. The mayor and city council
shall have the discretion to deny the formation of the proposed district when
the area to be improved has not previously been improved with a water system,
sewer system, and grading of streets. If the mayor and city council should deny
a requested improvement district formation, they shall state their grounds for
such denial in a written letter to interested parties.
Sec. 10. Original sections 16-617, 16-617.01, 16-618, 16-619, 16-620,
16-621, 16-622, 16-623, and 16-624, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are
repealed.
-3-